Washington statutes.
RCW 39.60.010

Investment of trust funds authorized.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other statute of the state of Washington to the contrary, it shall be lawful for any insurance company, savings and loan association, or for any bank, trust company or other financial institution, operating under the laws of the state of Washington, or for any executor, administrator, guardian or conservator, trustee or other fiduciary to invest its funds or the moneys in its custody or possession, eligible for investment, in notes or bonds secured by mortgage which the Federal Housing Administrator has insured or has made a commitment to insure in obligations of national mortgage associations, in debentures issued by the Federal Housing Administrator, and in the bonds of the Home Owner's Loan Corporation, a corporation organized under and by virtue of the authority granted in H.R. 5240, designated as the Home Owner's Loan Act of 1933, passed by the congress of the United States and approved June 13, 1933, and in bonds of any other corporation which is or hereafter may be created by the United States, as a governmental agency or instrumentality.

[ 2016 c 152 s 13; 1939 c 32 s 1; 1935 c 11 s 1; 1933 ex.s. c 37 s 1; RRS s 5545-1.]

NOTES:

Severability—1933 ex.s. c 37: "If any section, subsection, sentence, clause or phrase of this act for any reason shall be held to be unconstitutional, such holding shall not affect the validity of the remaining portion of this act. The legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this act in each section, subsection, sentence, clause and phrase thereof, separately and irrespective of the fact that any one or more of the sections, subsections, sentences, clauses or phrases be unconstitutional." [ 1933 ex.s. c 37 s 4.]